Missouri, session 2026, SB1068.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 221.111, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 221.111,
to read as follows:
221.111. 1. A person commits the offense of
possession of unlawful items in a prison or jail if such
person knowingly delivers, attempts to deliver, possesses,
deposits, or conceals in or about the premises of any
correctional center as the term "correctional center" is
defined under section 217.010, or any city, county, or
private jail:
(1) Any controlled substance as that term is defined
by law, except upon the written or electronic prescription
of a licensed physician, dentist, or veterinarian;
(2) Any other alkaloid of any kind or any intoxicating
liquor as the term intoxicating liquor is defined in section
311.020;
(3) Any article or item of personal property which a
prisoner is prohibited by law, by rule made pursuant to
section 221.060, or by regulation of the department of
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1068 2
corrections from receiving or possessing, except as herein
provided;
(4) Any gun, knife, weapon, or other article or item
of personal property that may be used in such manner as to
endanger the safety or security of the institution or as to
endanger the life or limb of any prisoner or employee
thereof;
(5) Any unauthorized portable electronic communication
device that is used to initiate, receive, store, or view
communication, information, images, or data electronically.
Such electronic communication devices shall include but not
be limited to: cellular telephones; portable telephones;
text-messaging devices; personal digital assistants; pagers;
broadband personal communication devices; electronic devices
with mobile data access; and any substantially similar
device that is used to initiate or receive communication or
store and review information, videos, images, or data.
2. The violation of subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of
this section shall be a class D felony; the violation of
subdivision (2) of this section shall be a class E felony;
the violation of subdivision (3) of this section shall be a
class A misdemeanor; [and] the violation of subdivision (4)
of this section shall be a class B felony; and the violation
of subdivision (5) of this section shall be a class D felony.
3. The chief operating officer of a county or city
jail or other correctional facility or the administrator of
a private jail may deny visitation privileges to or refer to
the county prosecuting attorney for prosecution any person
who knowingly delivers, attempts to deliver, possesses,
deposits, or conceals in or about the premises of such jail
or facility any personal item which is prohibited by rule or
regulation of such jail or facility. Such rules or

SB 1068 3
regulations, including a list of personal items allowed in
the jail or facility, shall be prominently posted for
viewing both inside and outside such jail or facility in an
area accessible to any visitor, and shall be made available
to any person requesting such rule or regulation. Violation
of this subsection shall be an infraction if not covered by
other statutes.
4. Any person who has been found guilty of a violation
of subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of this section involving
any alkaloid shall be entitled to expungement of the record
of the violation. The procedure to expunge the record shall
be pursuant to section 610.123. The record of any person
shall not be expunged if such person has been found guilty
of knowingly delivering, attempting to deliver, possessing,
depositing, or concealing any alkaloid of any controlled
substance in or about the premises of any correctional
center, or city or county jail, or private prison or jail.
✓